Hawaii statutes.
§287-27 Contents of motor vehicle liability
policy. Every motor vehicle liability policy shall state the name and
address of the named insured, the coverage afforded by the policy, the premium
charged therefor, the policy period, and the limits of liability, and shall
contain an agreement or be endorsed that insurance is provided thereunder in
accordance with the coverage defined in this chapter as respects bodily injury
and death or property damage, or both, and is subject to all the provisions of
this chapter. [L 1949, c 393, pt of §1; RL 1955, §160-105; HRS §287-27]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next